Utah statutes.
8-2-1.   State treasurer to receive donations.
Money which has been or shall be declared by an instrument in writing to be
intended for the perpetual care, maintenance, improvement, or embellishment of
any cemetery, or of any lots therein, to an amount not less than $50, may be
deposited with the state treasurer, who shall, in the name of the state,
receive and receipt for it. The depositors shall at the time of making such
deposit file with the treasurer and with the Division of Corporations and
Commercial Code a copy of the instrument which declares the purpose for which
the money so deposited is intended to be applied. If the cemetery is held in
private ownership, the deposit shall be accompanied by a written agreement on
the part of the person, association, or corporation operating the same that
the income derived from the sum so deposited will be applied to the purposes
designated by the depositor as set forth in the instrument filed with such
deposit.
